Utah, session 2026, HB520.
Section 1. Section 53H-9-405 is enacted to read:53H-9-405. Higher education student housing feasibility study.An employee of the governor's office who is an expert or advisor on housing strategy shall, in consultation with the commissioner of higher education:(1)complete a feasibility study that:(a)examines the impact of higher education student populations on home ownership in communities surrounding institutions of higher education, including the magnitude and costs; and(b)proposes opportunities for state and institutional mitigation of the impacts described in Subsection (1)(a), which may include:(i)a uniform statewide effort to create dedicated student, faculty, and staff housing on state- or institution-owned land; or(ii)state facilitation of negotiated development agreements with third-party developers for student housing;(2)ensure the involvement of presidents of institutions of higher education, the Utah Board of Higher Education, developers, municipalities in which an institution of higher education is located, and other interested parties in the process of completing the feasibility study; and(3)report to the Higher Education Appropriations Subcommittee before November 1, 2026, regarding the outcome of the feasibility study described in Subsection (1).

Section 2:
Section 2.  Effective Date.This bill takes effect:(1)except as provided in Subsection (2), May 6, 2026; or(2)if approved by two-thirds of all members elected to each house:(a)upon approval by the governor;(b)without the governor's signature, the day following the constitutional time limit of Utah Constitution, Article VII, Section 8; or(c)in the case of a veto, the date of veto override.